Tennessee, session 114, SB1412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-6-111(a)(4), is amended by
deleting the language "at least three (3) days in advance" and substituting "at least three (3)
business days in advance".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1412
003364
- 1 -